dictsource/pt_rules
//sort
    _f) o (L05_    o
  _red) o (L05_    O
   men) o (L05_    O
    _f) o (L07_    o
    _s) o (bL02_   O
   _af) o (bL04_   O
  _esn) o (bL04_   O
 _engl) o (bL04_   O
  _sal) o (brL08_  o
     _) o (cL08_   o
 _barr) o (cL08_   o
   _ch) o (chL08_  o
    _m) o (chA_    o
    _f) o (dL01_s  o
  _ecl) o (dL03_   o
 _expl) o (dL03_   o
 _impl) o (dL03_   o
    _m) o (fL01_   O
    _m) o (fL02_   O
   _af) o (fL04_   O
    _s) o (frL02_  O
    _l) o (grL04_  O
   _ap) oi (L01_   OI
   _ap) oi (L02_   OI
    _b) oi (L04_   OI
    _t) o (lL08_   o
    _f) o (lgL04_  O
  _emp) o (lgL04_  O
  _arr) o (lhL03_  O
  _enr) o (lhL03_  O
     _) o (lhL04_  O
     _) o (bstL04_ O
     m) o (lhL04_  O
   emb) o (lsL04_  O
  _env) o (ltL08_  o
  _esC) o (pA_     o
  antr) o (pL08_   o
  flex) o (rA_     o
     p) o (rL02_   o
  _dev) o (rL02_   O
 _apav) o (rL02_   O
 _defl) o (rL02_   O
 _impl) o (rL02_   O
   _ad) o (rL04_   O
  _ma@) o (r_      O
        o (rdens_  O
  _@um) o (re_     o
     f) o (rjo_    O
     f) o (rmL03_  O
     c) o (rrL01_  o         // incorra, corra, etc.
     m) o (rrL01_  o
 _Cach) o (rra_    o
    @p) o (rtL03_  O         // importo, etc.
   a_c) o (rte_    o
  as_c) o (rte_    o
  _abs) o (rvL01_  o
     t) o (rçL03_  o         // con-
    _c) o (sL01_   o
 _desc) o (sL01_   o
   enr) o (scL03_  O
    _r) o (snL04_  O
    _c) o (spL02_  O
   enr) o (squL02_ O
   emb) o (scL03_  O
     b) o (squL02_ O
        ossos (_   Os=Us#    // nossos, grossos, etc.
        ossos (_A  Os=Uz     // nossos, grossos, etc.
?1      ossos (_G  Os=UZ     // nossos, grossos, etc.
?2      ossos (_G  Os=Uz     // nossos, grossos, etc.
     p) ostos (_   Os#t=Us#   // dispostos etc.
     p) ostos (_A  Os#t=Uz    // dispostos etc.
?1   p) ostos (_G  Os#t=UZ    // dispostos etc.
?2   p) ostos (_G  Os#t=Uz    // dispostos etc.
        ortos (_   'Or#tUs#
        ortos (_A  'Or#tUz
?1      ortos (_G  'Or#tUZ
?2      ortos (_G  'Or#tUz
        ovos (_    Ov=Us#    novos, povos, etc.
        ovos (_A   Ov=Uz     novos, povos, etc.
?1      ovos (_G   Ov=UZ     novos, povos, etc.
?2      ovos (_G   Ov=Uz     novos, povos, etc.
        ortos (_   O*t=Us#   // tortos, mortos, etc.
  _Gar) o (tL08_   o
 _escr) o (tL08_   o
   zig) o (to_     o
   _ch) o (vL01_   o
    pr) o (vL03_   O
  _Com) o (do_     o
 ortod) o (xL08_   O
 heterod) o (xL08_ O
  _arr) ox (A      OS
    _B) o (jo_     o
     b) o (rdo_    O
     C) o (smA_    O
    _g) o (zL04_   O
  _alm) o (çL01_   O
  _esb) o (çL01_   O
    _r) o (çL03_   O
    tr) o (çL03_   O         // des-
   _ad) o (çL03_   O
  _emp) o (çL03_   O
  _end) o (çL03_   O
    _c) o (çL03_   O
//endsort

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
     _) o (HC_     ,O
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
   _CB) o (_       'O


.group ô
        ô          ''o

        ôm (_      ''o~N
        ôm (b      ''o~N
        ôm (p      ''o~N
        ôn (K      ''o~N

?4      ôm (_      ''o~
?4      ôm (b      ''o~
?4      ôm (p      ''o~
?4      ôn (K      ''o~

        ônh (A     ''o~n^


.group ó
        ó          ''O
        ói         ''OI
        ói (s      ''OI
        ó (iCK     ''O
        óu         ''Ow
        óu (s      ''Ow
        óy         ''OI
?2      ól (B      ''Ow

        óm (_      ''o~N
        óm (b      ''o~N
        óm (p      ''o~N
        ón (K      ''o~N

?4      óm (_      ''o~
?4      óm (b      ''o~
?4      óm (p      ''o~
?4      ón (K      ''o~


.group õ
        õ          o~
        õe         oI~
?4      õe         o~j/
        õem        'o~e~N
?4      õem        'o~e~j/


.group ò
        ò          O
        ò (@       ,O          // secondary stress in adverbs with -mente
?1      ò (nA      ,O
?1      ò (mA      ,O
?2      ò (nA      ,o
?2      ò (mA      ,o
        òn (K      ,o~N
        òm (K      ,o~N
        òi (K      ,OI


.group p
        p          p
        p (p+ 

?3   @) p (B       pI/
?3   @) p (_       pI/

        ph         f

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) p (B+      p,e       // PGrep
     _) p (ne+     pI/       // pneumonia
     _) p (sY+     pI/       // psicologia
     _) p (tA+     pI/       // pterodáctilo, ptolomaico
     _) pf (Y+     f         // pfizer, pfeifer (DE)

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) p (C_      p,e
   _AH) p (_       p'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) p (BA_     p,e
    _C) p (A_      p,e


.group q
        q          k
        q (q+ 

?3   @) q (B       kI/
?3   @) q (_       kI/

        qu         kw
        qü         kw
?4      qu         kw/
?4      qü         kw/
        qu (Y      k
        qu (K      ku
     _) que (_     ky
?1   _) que (@     ke        // quente, etc.
?1   _) quei (C    keI       // queira, queima, etc
     @) quên       kw''e~N   // frequência, etc.
   ade) qu (e      kw
     A) qu (idade_ kw
    _a) qu (ífero_ kw
     e) qu (estr   kw
    _e) qu (in     kw
   exe) qu (AC     kw
   fre) qu (ent    kw
?2  li) qu (id     kw
?2  lí) qu (id     kw
    lo) qu (en     kw
     n) qu (en     kw
     _) qu (inquAn kw
     _) qu (inquag kw
   _se) qu (el     kw
    se) qu (en     kw
  tran) qu (il     kw
?1      queç       kes       // esqueça.
?1   A) que (nA_   ke        // pequeno, etc.
?1   C) quê (_     ke        // porquê, etc.
?1      que (l     ke        // aquele, etc.
?1      que (r_    kE        // qualquer, etc.
?1      qui (@     ki        // quinta, esquilo, etc.
?1      quiu (_    kiU       // extorquiu, ressequiu, retorquiu
     _) qu (inde   ku        // quindecágono, etc.
?1   _) quo        kuo       // quoficiente, etc.

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) q (B+      k,e       // QSort

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) q (C_      k,e
   _AH) q (_       k'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) q (BA_     k,e
    _C) q (A_      k,e


.group r
        r          *
        r (_       r#
        r (C       r#
     A) r (A       *
     A) r (_A      *
     A) r (_h      *
     C) r (A       *
        rr         R#
        rr (r+ 
     _) r ($noprefix R#      // use without prefix only
     l) r (A       R#
     m) r (+       R#
     n) r (+       R#
     s) r          R#

?1   _) retro (@@  R#,Et*O
?1   _) retro (ceC R#,yt*%u  // retroceder, retrocesso
?1   _) retro (esc R#,yt*%u  // retroescavadora
?1   _) retro (grA R#,yt*%u  // retrogradar, retrogressivo
?1   _) retro (sar R#,yt*%u  // retrosaria, retroseiro
?1   _) retro (sei R#,yt*o   // retrosaria, retroseiro
?1   _) retro (-   R#,Et*%O  // retro-ovárico

?4   A) rr         R#        // terra
?4   A) r (G       r/        // born, borg
?4   A) r (_G      r/        // tornar-me
?4   A) r (lK      r/        // carl, pearl
?4   A) r (sK      r/        // perspectiva

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
?1   _) r (B+      ,ER#;      // RSync
?2   _) r (B+      ,ER#i

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
?1 _AH) r (_       'ER#;
?2 _AH) r (_       'ER#i/
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
?1   _) r (BA_     ,ER#;
?2   _) r (BA_     ,ER#i/


.group s
        s          s
        ss         s
        ss (s+ 
        sc (Y      s
        sç         s
        sh         S
     A) s (A       z
     b) s (C       s#
     n) s (C       s#
     n) s (h       S

?1   A) sc (Y      Ss        // nascer, crescer
?1   A) sç (A      Ss        // nasçam, cresçam

     @) s (_S1     s#        // plural suffix
     @) s (_AS1    z         // plural suffix preceding a vowel

?!4  @) s (_GS1    z         // next word starts with voiced consonant
?!4  A) s (_GS1    z         // next word starts with voiced consonant

    @') s (_S2     s#        // genitive and plural in English
    C') s (_S2     s#        // Bob's, CD's etc

   ese) s (_       s#

?1   A) s (C       s#
?1   A) s (h       S
?1   A) ss         s
?1   A) s (G+      Z
?1   A) s (_KS1    s#
?1   A) s (_G+S1   Z
        s (G       z
        s (w+      s
        sr         zx
   _ob) s (eq      z         // obsequioso
   _ob) s (éq      z         // obséquio
  tran) s (A       z         // trans+amazônico, except tran+secular
 _trân) s (ito_    z
  _sub) s (ist     z
?1      ssion (_   _^_EN

        sch        S         // Schmidt, Schneider (German)

     @) sz (K      S         // Liszt, Grosz (Polish)
    @!) ski (_     sk%i      // Polish immigrants

?1   _) semi (@@   s,ym%i    // semiárido, semibárbaro, semicírculo
?1   _) semi (-    s,ym%i    // semi-internato, semi-inconsciente
?1   _) semi (ta_  s,ymi     // semita
?2   _) semi (-    s,em%i
     _) semi (_    s'em%i

?1   _) super (@@   s,up%E*
?1   _) super (açA  s,upy* // superação
?1   _) super (adA  s,upy* // superado
?1   _) super (anC  s,upy* // superando
?1   _) super (Ave  s,upy* // superável
?1   _) super (fic  s,upy* // superficial
?1   _) super (ior  s,upy* // superiora, superiores
?1   _) super (sti  s,upy* // superstição
?1   _) super (-    s,up%E*
?1   _) super (_    s'up%E*
?2   _) super (-    s,up%e*
?2   _) super (_    s'up%e*

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
?1 _AH) s (_       'Es|;
?2 _AH) s (_       'Esi/
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
?1   _) s (BA_     ,Es|;
?1  _C) s (A_      ,Es|;
?2   _) s (BA_     ,Esi/
?2  _C) s (A_      ,Esi/


.group t
        t          t
?2      t (_       t#
?2      t (i       t#
?2      t (í       t#
?2      t (ì       t#
?2      t (Y_      t#
        t (t+ 

?3   @) t (B       tI/
?3   @) t (_       tI/

        tch (A     tS

?1      th         _^_EN
?2      th         t#

?1      tion (_    _^_EN
?2   A) te (o_     tSj

    @!) tti (_     =t#i       // Italian immigrants

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) t (B+      t,e       // TPut
     _) t (s+      t         // tsunâmi
     _) t (z+      t         // tzarina

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) t (C_      t,e
   _AH) t (_       t'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) t (BA_     t,e
    _C) t (A_      t,e


.group u
        u          u
        u (A       w
     l) u (AC      u
     r) u (AC      u
        u (a       u
     g) u (a+      w
     q) u (a+      w
        u (eC      u
        u (ei      u
     r) u (_A      u
        u (L04_    'u

        ui         uI
        ui (A      uj;
        ui (_      'uI
        uy         uI
        uy (A      uj;

?4      ui         uj/
?4      ui (_      'uj/
?4      uy         uj/

        u (iu_     w
        u (iCK     u
        u (éC      u
        u (íC      u

?2      ul (_      uw
?2      ul (B      uw

        u (lh+     u
        u (ll+     u
        ull (K     ul#

        um (_      u~N
        um (b      u~N
        um (p      u~N
        un (K      u~N

?4      um (_      u~
?4      um (b      u~
?4      um (p      u~
?4      un (K      u~

        unh (A     u~n^
        u (mmA     u
        u (nnA     u

     g) u (Y 
    _m) ui (t      uI~
    _r) ui (v      uI

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
     _) u (HC_     ,u
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
   _CB) u (_       'u


.group ú
        ú          ''u
?2      úl (B      ''uw

        úm (_      ''u~N
        úm (b      ''u~N
        úm (p      ''u~N
        ún (K      ''u~N

?4      úm (_      ''u~
?4      úm (b      ''u~
?4      úm (p      ''u~
?4      ún (K      ''u~

        únh (A     ''u~n^


.group ù
        ù          u
        ù (@       ,u          // secondary stress in adverbs with -mente
        ùn (K      ,u~N
        ùn (K      ,u~N


.group v
        v          v
        v (v+ 

?3   @) v (B       vI/
?3   @) v (_       vI/

    // in compound words like 'C-Word'
     _) v (B+      v,e       // VBox

    // in acronyms like 'A.B.C.'
    _A) v (C_      v,e
   _AH) v (_       v'e
    // in acronyms like 'C.B.A.'
     _) v (BA_     v,e
    _C) v (A_      v,e


.group w
        w          w
?1      w (_       _^_EN
